Missouri, session 2026, HB3125.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 137, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 137.1062, to read as follows:
137.1062. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Eligible owner", an individual who:
(a) Has reached sixty-five years of age as of January first of the year for which
an exemption is granted under this section;
(b) Is the owner of record of the residential real property used as a homestead or
has a legal or equitable interest in the residential real property used as a homestead as
evidenced by a written instrument; and
(c) Is liable for the payment of real property taxes on the residential real
property used as a homestead;
(2) "Homestead", the residential real property that is used as a primary
residence and the adjacent real property as is reasonably necessary for use of the
residence as a home dwelling.
2. In addition to all other exemptions authorized under Article X, Section 6 of
the Constitution of Missouri or otherwise authorized by law, and as authorized under
Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, for all tax years beginning on or
after January 1, 2027, a homestead owned by an eligible owner shall be exempt from the
real property tax assessed on such homestead.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3125 2
3. (1) An exemption granted under this section shall not be transferred or
assigned.
(2) An eligible owner who receives an exemption granted under this section shall
not be eligible for any other real property tax relief, the property tax credits under
sections 135.010 to 135.035, or any other tax credits relating to the eligible owner's
homestead under this chapter or chapter 135.
(3) An exemption granted under this section shall not affect the process of setting
the tax rate as required under Article X, Section 22 of the Constitution of Missouri and
section 137.073 in any prior, current, or subsequent tax year.
4. As provided in Article X, Section 6(a) of the Constitution of Missouri, the state
shall reimburse any political subdivision for revenues lost by reason of the exemption
provided in this section.
5. This section shall not be subject to the provisions of the Missouri sunset act
under sections 23.250 to 23.298.
✔